Louisiana, session 2026, SB235.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2191(C) through (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
38:2191(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2191. Payments under contract
* * *
C. Except as provided in R.S. 38:2248(C), a public entity shall not
withhold liquidated damages contested by the contractor from any payments
or monies otherwise due, provided that payment to the contractor shall not
prejudice the ability of a public entity to assert a claim for liquidated damages
against the contractor in an ordinary proceeding. The prevailing party shall be
entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees in connection with a public entity's
claim for liquidated damages in an ordinary proceeding. A public entity shall
be entitled to interest on liquidated damages recovered charged at one-half
percent accumulated daily, not to exceed fifteen percent, accruing from the date
of payment by the public entity of contested liquidated damages as provided for
by this Subsection.
D. The provisions of this Section shall not be subject to waiver by contract.
DE. Any public entity failing to make any progressive stage payments
arbitrarily or without reasonable cause, or any final payment when due as provided
in this Section, shall be subject to mandamus to compel the payment of the sums due
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 235 ENROLLED
under the contract up to the amount of the appropriation made for the award and
execution of the contract, including any authorized change orders, together with
attorney fees and interest as provided for by this Section. If the public entity
prevails in an action brought against it pursuant to this Subsection, the
contractor shall be liable for reasonable attorney fees. Any claim by a public
entity to recover liquidated damages pursuant to Subsection C of this Section
shall not be subject to the mandamus proceeding.
EF. A declaration that a public works contract is null and void as being
contrary to the provisions of R.S. 38:2211 et seq. shall not affect amounts due and
payable under the contract, including overhead and profit, for the work performed
by or on behalf of the contractor.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature of the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.